Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.275

Violations—Penalties.

(1) Any entity who knowingly violates any provision of this chapter or who knowingly gives false or incorrect information to the secretary, attorney general, or county prosecuting attorney in filing statements required by this chapter, whether or not such statement or report is verified is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Any entity who violates any provisions of this chapter or who gives false or incorrect information to the secretary, attorney general, or county prosecuting attorney in filing statements required by this chapter, whether or not such statement or report is verified, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2011 c 199 s 19; 2003 c 53 s 142; 1993 c 471 s 15; 1986 c 230 s 18; 1983 c 265 s 11; 1982 c 227 s 12; 1977 ex.s. c 222 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—1982 c 227: See note following RCW 19.09.100.